Washington statutes.
RCW 10.82.070

Disposition of monetary payments.

(1) All sums of money derived from costs, fines, penalties, and forfeitures imposed or collected, in whole or in part, by a superior court for violation of orders of injunction, mandamus and other like writs, for contempt of court, or for breach of the penal laws shall be paid in cash by the person collecting the same, within twenty days after the collection, to the county treasurer of the county in which the same have accrued.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 9A.88.120 and 10.99.080, the county treasurer shall remit monthly thirty-two percent of the money received under this section except for certain costs to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund and shall deposit the remainder as provided by law. "Certain costs" as used in this subsection, means those costs awarded to prevailing parties in civil actions under RCW 4.84.010 or 36.18.040, or those costs awarded against convicted defendants in criminal actions under RCW 10.01.160, 10.46.190, or 36.18.040, or other similar statutes if such costs are specifically designated as costs by the court and are awarded for the specific reimbursement of costs incurred by the state or county in the prosecution of the case, including the fees of defense counsel. Costs or assessments awarded to dedicated accounts, state or local, are not subject to this state allocation or to RCW 7.68.035.

(3) All fees, fines, forfeitures and penalties collected or assessed by a district court because of the violation of a state law shall be remitted as provided in chapter 3.62 RCW as now exists or is later amended. All fees, fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or assessed by a superior court in cases on appeal from a lower court shall be remitted to the municipal or district court from which the cases were appealed.

[ 2012 c 136 s 6; 2012 c 134 s 8; 2009 c 479 s 13; 2004 c 15 s 6; 1995 c 292 s 3; 1988 c 169 s 5; 1987 c 202 s 169; 1985 c 389 s 7; 1984 c 258 s 313; 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 11; 1967 c 122 s 1; 1965 c 158 s 16; 1919 c 30 s 1; 1909 p 323 s 9; 1897 c 118 s 113; 1895 c 68 s 1; 1890 p 383 s 89; 1886 p 20 s 58; Code 1881 s 3211; 1873 p 421 s 3; RRS s 4940. Formerly codified as RCW 9.01.140.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Intent—2004 c 15: See note following RCW 10.99.080.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Effective date—1985 c 389: See note following RCW 27.24.070.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Intent—1984 c 258: See note following RCW 3.34.130.